Hawaii statutes.
[§6E-52] Transfer of lands. Any county
or the State may transfer lands to the department for the purposes of this
part, which are declared public purposes, on any terms or conditions or tenure
or otherwise as the county or the State may desire to impose, any other law
restricting such transfer, or restricting the type, location or classification
of lands which may be transferred, to the contrary notwithstanding. Lands
under Executive Order No. 1534, dated November 19, 1952, are transferred
to the department of land and natural resources; provided that the aforesaid
land under Executive Order No. 1534, subject to current encumbrances and the
agreement reached on August 3, 1961, between the Pacific War Memorial
Commission of Hawaii and the Disabled American Veterans, shall be used for the
purposes for which that land was set aside, a site for the creation and
maintenance of a living war memorial as provided by Act 288, Session Laws of
Hawaii 1949, as amended by Joint Resolution 37, Session Laws of Hawaii 1951. [L
1981, c 135, pt of §3]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next